Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2361.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 23, chapter 2, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 23-207, to read: START_STATUTE23-207. Public employer; private employer; noncompete clause; prohibition; definition A. As a condition of employment, it is unlawful for a public or private employer to require a current or prospective employee to agree to a noncompete clause. B. For the purposes of this section, "noncompete clause" means a clause in an employment contract with an employee that prohibits the employee from working in a specific geographic area for a specific period of time after leaving that employment. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Applicability Section 23-207, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act, applies to contracts entered into on or after the effective date of this act.